Alaska statutes. Title 10. Corporations and Associations.
Article 8. Organic Change.
Sec. 10.06.595.
Application of provisions.

Except as provided by AS

10.55.201(c)(1)(A)

and

10.55.301(d)

, a corporation may enter into a merger, interest exchange, conversion, or domestication under AS 10.55. AS

10.06.566

and

10.06.568

do not apply to mergers, interest exchanges, conversions, and domestications that are covered by AS 10.55.

History.

(§ 1 ch 60 SLA 2013)

Effective dates. —

Section 34, ch. 60, SLA 2013 makes this section effective July 1, 2014.

Editor’s notes. —

Under sec. 32, ch. 60, SLA 2013 in the 2013 Temporary and Special Acts, this section does not affect an action or proceeding begun or right accrued before July 1, 2014.

Sec. 10.06.600.
Definitions.

In AS

10.06.530

—

10.06.590

,

“consolidation” means a consolidation authorized by AS

10.06.534

or

10.06.562

;

“merger” means a merger authorized by AS

10.06.530

or

10.06.562

;

“share exchange” means a share exchange authorized by AS

10.06.538

or an exchange of shares covered by AS

10.06.562

.

History.

(§ 1 ch 60 SLA 2013)

Effective dates. —

Section 34, ch. 60, SLA 2013 makes this section effective July 1, 2014.

Editor’s notes. —

Under sec. 32, ch. 60, SLA 2013 in the 2013 Temporary and Special Acts, this section does not affect an action or proceeding begun or right accrued before July 1, 2014.